ladina.dic
abeō/1,1004,10041,10042,10043,10044,10045,10046,10047 po:verb st:abīre
absolūtum/1,1023,10231 po:verb st:absolvere
accēdere/1,1033,10330 po:verb st:accēdere
accessum/1,1023,10231 po:verb st:accēdere
accēpī/1,1013,10131,10132,10133,10134 po:verb st:accipere
accidī/1,1013,10131,10132,10133,10134 po:verb st:accidere
accidō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:accidere
accingere/1,1033,10330 po:verb st:accingere
accipiō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:accipere
acceptum/1,1023,10231 po:verb st:accipere
accucurrī/1,1013,10131,10132,10133,10134 po:verb al:accurrere st:accurrere
accurrere/1,1033,10330 po:verb st:accurrere
additum/1,1023,10231 po:verb st:addere
addīcere/1,1033,10330 po:verb st:addīcere
addīcō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:addīcere
addidī/1,1013,10131,10132,10133,10134 po:verb st:addere
adductum/1,1023,10231 po:verb st:addūcere
addūcō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:addūcere
addūxī/1,1013,10131,10132,10133,10134 po:verb st:addūcere
adeō/1,1004,10041,10042,10043,10044,10045,10046,10047 po:verb st:adīre
agere/1,1033,10330 po:verb st:agere
audiō/1,1004,10041,10042,10043,10044,10045,10046,10047 po:verb st:audīre
cadō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:cadere
cāsum/1,1023,10231 po:verb st:cadere
capere/1,1033,10330 po:verb st:capere
cognoscō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:cognoscere
cognitum/1,1023,10231 po:verb st:cognoscere
cognōvī/1,1013,10131,10132,10133,10134 po:verb st:cognoscere
colere/1,1033,10330 po:verb st:colere
crēditum/1,1023,10231 po:verb st:crēdere
crēdidī/1,1013,10131,10132,10133,10134 po:verb st:crēdere
crēdō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:crēdere
currere/1,1033,10330 po:verb st:currere
dictum/1,1023,10231 po:verb st:dīcere
dīcō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:dīcere
didicī/1,1013,10131,10132,10133,10134 po:verb st:discere
discere/1,1033,10330 po:verb st:discere
dormiō/1,1004,10041,10042,10043,10044,10045,10046,10047 po:verb st:dormīre
dūcō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:dūcere
dūxī/1,1013,10131,10132,10133,10134 po:verb st:dūcere
emere/1,1033,10330 po:verb st:emere
ēmptum/1,1023,10231 po:verb st:emere
ēmī/1,1013,10131,10132,10133,10134 po:verb st:emere
faciō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:facere
fugere/1,1033,10330 po:verb st:fugere
fūgī/1,1013,10131,10132,10133,10134 po:verb st:fugere
intellegō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:intellegere
intellēctum/1,1023,10231 po:verb st:intellegere
legere/1,1033,10330 po:verb st:legere
lēgī/1,1013,10131,10132,10133,10134 po:verb st:legere
mittō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:mittere
missum/1,1023,10231 po:verb st:mittere
planxī/1,1013,10131,10132,10133,10134 po:verb st:planctere
planctere/1,1033,10330 po:verb st:planctere
positum/1,1023,10231 po:verb st:pōnere
pōnō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:pōnere
pūniō/1,1004,10041,10042,10043,10044,10045,10046,10047 po:verb st:pūnīre
rapere/1,1033,10330 po:verb st:rapere
rapuī/1,1013,10131,10132,10133,10134 po:verb st:rapere
sciō/1,1004,10041,10042,10043,10044,10045,10046,10047 po:verb st:scīre
scrīptum/1,1023,10231 po:verb st:scrībere
scrībō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:scrībere
sentiō/1,1004,10041,10042,10043,10044,10045,10046,10047 po:verb st:sentīre
sepeliō/1,1004,10041,10042,10043,10044,10045,10046,10047 po:verb st:sepelīre
serviō/1,1004,10041,10042,10043,10044,10045,10046,10047 po:verb st:servīre
veniō/1,1004,10041,10042,10043,10044,10045,10046,10047 po:verb st:venīre
vīcī/1,1013,10131,10132,10133,10134 po:verb st:vincere
vīctum/1,1023,10231 po:verb st:vīvere
vīvō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:vīvere
